District of Columbia statutes.
4-1306.01

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor may, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter within 90 days of June 27, 2000. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

All existing rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this subchapter shall remain in effect until the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section become effective.

(c)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor shall have full authority to enforce the provisions of subchapter.

(d)

(1)

Within 180 days of June 29, 2011, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the Families Together Amendment Act of 2010, effective September 24, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-228; 57 DCR 6926).

(2)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30 day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within the 30 day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title VI, § 601, formerly § 341
as added June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 201(g), 47 DCR 2850
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 22(b), 53 DCR 6794
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-228, § 2(c), 57 DCR 6926
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5052(b), 58 DCR 6226

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-1301.04.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-191 renumbered the section.
D.C. Law 18-228 added subsec. (d).
D.C. Law 19-21 rewrote subsec. (d)(1), which formerly read:
“(d)(1) Within 180 days of September 24, 2010, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement D.C. Law 18-228.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e), (f) of Adoption and Safe Families Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-56, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1978).

Temporary Repeal of Section

Section 109 of D.C. Law 19-226 repealed D.C. Law 18-228, § 3.
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 6-2109.1 to 6-2109.9 1981 Ed., see § 201(f) of the Adoption and Safe Families Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-117, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6558).
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 6-2109.1 to 6-2109.9 1981 Ed., see § 201(f) of the Adoption and Safe Families Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-178, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9714).
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 6-2109.1 to 6-2109.9 1981 Ed., see § 201(f) of the Adoption and Safe Families Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-240, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 556).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5022(b) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 18-228, § 3, see § 109 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 18-228, § 3, see § 109 of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable as of January 10, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-228, § 3, see § 7011 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 18-228, § 3, see § 7011 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

References in Text

The “Families Together amendment”, referred to in subsection (d)(1) of this section, is D.C. Law 18-228.

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-228 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 7011 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 18-228, § 3.